Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4006
Suspend, defined.

Suspend shall mean to temporarily interrupt for up to one year all rights and privileges under a license or certification.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 28.